Utah statutes.
16-16-703.   Duration of marketing contract.

The initial duration of a marketing contract may not exceed 10 years, but the contract may be self-renewing for additional periods not exceeding five years each.  Unless the contract provides for another manner or time for termination, either party may terminate the contract by giving notice in a record at least 90 days before the end of the current term.

